District of Columbia statutes.
2-1515.08

Transfers.

(a)

All real or personal property, leased or assigned to the Department of Human Services on behalf of the Youth Services Administration, positions, assets, records, and obligations, and all unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to those powers, duties, functions and operations of the Department of Human Services as set forth in, and utilized to carry out, section III (S) and III (W) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1986, effective January 3, 1987, relating to the Youth Services Administration are hereby transferred to the Department.

(b)

All of the authority and functions of the Department of Human Services as set forth in section III (S) and III (W) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1986, effective January 3, 1987, relating to the Youth Services Administration are hereby transferred to the Department.

(c)

All real and personal property, Career and Excepted Service, Management Supervisory Service, trainee positions, assets, records, obligations, and all unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to the powers, duties, functions, operations, and administration of the Youth Services Administration shall become the property of the Department.

(d)

All real and personal property, positions, assets, records, and obligations, and all unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to the powers, duties, functions, and operations of the “Compact Administrator” of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, as authorized by subchapter II of Chapter 14 of Title 4 [§  4-1421 et seq.]. shall become the property of the Department.

(e)

All positions, real and personal property, assets, records, and obligations, and all unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to the powers, duties, functions, and operations of the Youth Services Administration of the Department of Human Services in operating and regulating secure and residential facilities, juvenile justice services, programs, and supports, shall be transferred to the Department.

(f)

The Department shall recognize and bargain with collective bargaining representatives that have been duly certified by the Public Employee Relations Board and shall assume and be bound by all existing collective bargaining agreements entered into by the Youth Services Administration of the Department of Human Services, if those agreements have been approved by the Council, unless Council approval is not required by law, and, during a control year, as defined in § 47-393(4), the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority.

(g)

Every employee of the Youth Services Administration shall be transferred to the Department. An employee transferred to the Department shall be transferred in the same classification he or she held at the Department of Human Services, Youth Services Administration, or other department, at the time of the transfer. Subject to the District’s authority to convert them to the Management Supervisory Service and the Legal Service consistent with Chapter 6 of Title 1 [§ 1-601.01 et seq.], transferred employees shall retain all rights and privileges related to their individual pay and benefits, including retirement status, so long as the employee is continuously employed by the Department or the District government, including any applicable rights and privileges provided for in § 44-906.

(h)

The following rules and regulations pertaining to the licensing, oversight, and regulation of residential placement facilities for detained, delinquent youth and PINS shall remain in full force and effect unless and until repealed or superseded by action of the Department:

(1)

Chapter 62 of Title 29 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (Licensing of Youth Shelters, Runaway Shelters, Emergency Care Facilities and Youth Group Homes); provided, that the Department shall perform all functions that Chapter 62 vests in the Department of Human Services, Youth Services Administration, and as the contracting entity shall perform all services, licensure, oversight and investigations placement, and monitoring functions previously performed by the Department of Human Services, Youth Services Administration, pursuant to the authority granted by Chapter 21 of Title 7 [§ 7-2101.01 et seq.], except those functions which have been delegated, under the discretion of the Director of the Department, by memoranda of understanding or agreement.

(2)

Chapter 63 of Title 29 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (Licensing of Independent Living program for Adolescents and Young Adults); provided, that the Department shall perform all functions that Chapter 63 vests in the Department of Human Services, Youth Services Administration, and as the contracting entity shall perform all services, licensure, oversight and investigations placement, and monitoring functions previously performed by the Department of Human Services, Youth Services Administration, except those functions which have been delegated, under the discretion of the Director of the Department, by memoranda of understanding or agreement.

(3)

Chapter 12 of Title 29 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (Community Placement of Juvenile Offenders); provided, that the Department shall perform all functions that Chapter 12 vests in the Department of Human Services, Youth Services Administration, except those functions which have been delegated, under the discretion of the Director of the Department, by memoranda of understanding or agreement.

History

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-335, § 108, 52 DCR 2025

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 108 of Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Establishment Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-657, December 29, 2004, 52 DCR 481).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 108 of Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-58, March 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3182).